Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.190

Clarification of confirmed award.

If the meaning or effect of an award confirmed under RCW 26.14.150 is in dispute, the parties may:

(1) Agree to arbitrate the dispute before the original arbitrator or another arbitrator; or

(2) Proceed in court under law of this state other than this chapter governing clarification of a judgment in a family law proceeding.

[ 2023 c 61 s 20.]